Wyoming, session 2026, HB0169.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-13-201 is created to read:

ARTICLE 2
LIMITATION ON EXPENDITURE OF STATE FUNDS

HB0169

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0484
9-13-201. Prohibition on use of public funds for
certain organizations.

(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Public funds" means any funds appropriated
by the legislature or any money received by a state agency
or political subdivision pursuant to law;

(ii) "Specified organizations" means any of the
following:

(A) Environmental council of the states;

(B) Council of chief state school officers;

(C) National association of medicaid
directors;

(D) Association of state and territorial
health officials.

HB0169

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0484
(b) No public funds shall be expended to pay
membership fees, dues or any other contribution to a
specified organization. For purposes of this section,
"contribution" shall include payments made in exchange for
membership benefits that do not include the purchase of
goods or services.

(c) No public funds shall be expended to pay for any
expenses where the primary purpose of the expenditure is to
participate in a specified organization. For purposes of
this section, "expenditure" shall include travel,
registration fees or other costs associated with
conferences, meetings or other events sponsored by a
specified organization.

Section 2. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
alter, amend or impair any contract or other agreement
entered into before the effective date of this act.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0169